apertium-de-nl.de.dix
    <pardef n="Niederlande__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Schweiz__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ukraine__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Vereinigten_Staaten__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Pronomen -->
      <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>ich</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
         </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>du</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
         </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>er</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
         </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>sie</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
         </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>es</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
         </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>wir</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
         </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>ihr</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
         </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>sie</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
         </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>Sie</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
         </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>man</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="probj__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mich</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dobj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>dich</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dobj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>ihn</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dobj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>sie</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dobj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>es</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dobj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>uns</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dobj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>euch</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dobj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>sie</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dobj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>Sie</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dobj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>einen</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dobj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>mir</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="iobj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>dir</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="iobj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>ihm</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="iobj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>ihr</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="iobj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>ihm</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="iobj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>uns</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="iobj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>euch</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="iobj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>ihnen</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="iobj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>Ihnen</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="iobj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>einem</l>
           <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="iobj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
       </e>
      </pardef>

    <e lm="pronoms personals de subjecte"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="pronoms personals de object"><i/><par n="probj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="Niederlande"><i>Niederlande</i><par n="Niederlande__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Schweiz"><i>Schweiz</i><par n="Schweiz__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ukraine"><i>Ukraine</i><par n="Ukraine__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Vereinigten Staaten"><i>Vereinigten Staaten</i><par n="Vereinigten_Staaten__np"/></e>
